Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.250.080

Administration of statewide student assessment—Waiver of scheduled dates.

An online school program may request a waiver from the office of the superintendent of public instruction to administer one or more sections of the statewide student assessment for grades three through eight for some or all students enrolled in the program on alternate days or on an alternate schedule, as long as the administration is within the testing period established by the office. The office may deny a request for a waiver if the online school program's proposal does not maintain adequate test security or would reduce the reliability of the assessment results by providing an inequitable advantage for some students.

[ 2013 2nd sp.s. c 18 s 509.]

NOTES:

Application—Enforcement of laws protecting health and safety—2013 2nd sp.s. c 18: See note following RCW 28A.600.022.